Wyoming, session 2026, HB0138.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-6-140 through 35-6-149 are created
to read:

HB0138

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0399
35-6-140. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Reproductive Freedom Act."

35-6-141. Public policy.

(a) It is the public policy of the state of Wyoming
that:

(i) Every person has the right to freedom from
governmental interference with respect to personal
reproductive decisions;

(ii) Every person has the right to choose or
refuse birth control;

(iii) Every person has the right to choose or
refuse to have an abortion, except as specifically limited
by this act;

HB0138

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0399
(iv) The state shall not deny or interfere with
a person's right to choose or refuse to have an abortion,
except as specifically permitted by this act;

(v) The state shall not discriminate against the
exercise of these rights in the regulation or provision of
benefits, facilities, services or information.

35-6-142. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Abortion" means any medical treatment,
medication or procedure intended to induce the termination
of a pregnancy, except for the purpose of producing a live
birth;

(ii) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means
as defined by W.S. 33-21-120(a)(i);

(iii) "Health care provider" means a person who
is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or permitted
HB0138

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0399
by the laws of this state to administer health care in the
ordinary course of business or practice of a profession;

(iv) "Physician" means a person licensed to
practice medicine as a physician under the Medical Practice
Act;

(v) "Physician assistant" means a person
licensed to practice medicine as a physician assistant
under the Medical Practice Act;

(vi) "Pregnancy" means the reproductive process
beginning with the implantation of an embryo in a uterus;

(vii) "Private medical facility" means any
medical facility that is not owned or operated by the
state;

(viii) "State" means the state of Wyoming and
any authority, board, commission, department, division or
separate operating agency of the executive, legislative or
judicial branch of the state of Wyoming, including its
political subdivisions and instrumentalities;
HB0138

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0399

(ix) "Viability" means the point in the
pregnancy when, in the judgment of the physician, physician
assistant, advanced practice registered nurse or other
health care provider acting within the provider's scope of
practice on the particular facts of the case before the
physician, physician assistant, advanced practice
registered nurse or other health care provider acting
within the health care provider's scope of practice, there
is a significant likelihood of the fetus's sustained
survival outside the uterus without the application of
extraordinary medical measures;

(x) "This act" means W.S. 35-6-140 through
35-6-149.

35-6-143. Right to have and provide an abortion.

(a) The state shall not deny or interfere with a
person's right to have an abortion:

(i) Prior to the viability of the fetus; or

HB0138

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0399
(ii) To protect the person's life or health.

(b) A physician, physician assistant, advanced
practice registered nurse or other health care provider
acting within the provider's scope of practice may
terminate a pregnancy as permitted by this act.

(c) A health care provider may assist a physician,
physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse or
other health care provider acting within the health care
provider's scope of practice in terminating a pregnancy as
permitted by this act.

35-6-144. Unauthorized abortions; penalty.

(a) Unless otherwise authorized by this act, any
person who provides medical treatment, provides medication
or performs a procedure intended to induce the termination
of a pregnancy shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable
by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine not
to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

HB0138

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0399
(b) Except as provided in subsection (a) of this
section, the state shall not penalize, prosecute or
otherwise take adverse action against a person for aiding
or assisting a person seeking an abortion in exercising the
person's right to have an abortion under this act.

(c) Nothing in this act shall be construed to subject
a person upon whom any abortion is performed or attempted
to any criminal penalty under this act.

35-6-145. Defense to prosecution.

The good faith judgment of a physician, physician
assistant, advanced practice registered nurse or other
health care provider acting within the provider's scope of
practice as to the viability of the fetus or as to the risk
to the life or health of a person seeking an abortion shall
be a complete defense in any proceeding for a violation of
this act.

35-6-146. State regulation.

HB0138

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0399
(a) Any regulation promulgated by the state relating
to abortion shall be valid only if:

(i) The regulation is medically necessary to
protect the life or health of the person seeking an
abortion;

(ii) The regulation is consistent with
established medical practice; and

(iii) Of the available alternatives, the
regulation imposes the least restrictions on the person's
right to have an abortion under this act.

35-6-147. Refusing to participate in an abortion.

(a) No person or private medical facility shall be
required by law or contract to participate in the
performance or procurement of an abortion if the person or
private medical facility objects to participating in the
performance of an abortion.

HB0138

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0399
(b) No person shall be discriminated against in
employment or professional privileges because of the
person's participation or refusal to participate in the
performance or procurement of an abortion.

35-6-148. State provided benefits.

If the state provides, directly or by contract, maternity
care benefits, services or information through any program
administered or funded in whole or in part by the state,
the state shall also provide persons otherwise eligible for
the program with substantially equivalent benefits,
services or information to permit them to voluntarily
terminate their pregnancies.

35-6-149. Construction.

This act shall not be construed to define the state's
interest in the fetus for any purpose other than the
specific provisions of this act.

HB0138

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0399
Section 2. W.S. 21-16-1801, 35-6-120 through
35-6-139, 35-6-201 through 35-6-204, 35-6-301 and 35-6-302
are repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0138